Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-106
Jail register; required entries.

The sheriff or such other person as may be charged with the administrative direction of the jail shall procure, at the expense of the proper county, a suitable book to be called the jail register, in which he or she shall enter (1) the name of each prisoner, with the date and cause of his or her commitment, (2) the date or manner of his or her discharge, (3) what sickness, if any, has prevailed in the jail during the year and if known, what were the causes of such disease, (4) whether any or what labor has been performed by the prisoners, and the value thereof, (5) the habits of the prisoners as to personal cleanliness, diet, and order, (6) the operations of the rules and directions prescribed by the Jail Standards Board, (7) the means furnished prisoners of literary, moral, and religious instruction, and of labor, and (8) all other matters required by the rules, or in the discretion of such person deemed proper. The sheriff or such other person as may be charged with the administrative direction of the jail shall carefully keep and preserve the jail register in his or her office and at the expiration of his or her office shall deliver the same to the successor in office.

R.S.1866, c. 29, § 6, p. 244;

R.S.1913, § 3534;

C.S.1922, § 3001;

C.S.1929, § 47-106;

R.S.1943, § 47-106;

Laws 1975, LB 417, § 34;

Laws 1984, LB 394, § 14;

Laws 1996, LB 233, § 7.